Louisiana, session 2026, HB776.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 34:3452(A)(1)(introductory paragraph) and (D), 3453,
3457(A)(introductory paragraph) and 3473 are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
34:3451(6) through (8) and 3457(C) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3451. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the
following definitions shall apply:
* * *
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 776 ENROLLED
(6) "Benefit cost ratio" means the total benefits divided by the total cost of
a project with the total cost being equal to the total investment required to implement
the total project and derive the benefits and with total benefits being equal to the
revenues less expenses, number of jobs, payroll benefits, spin-off benefits of payroll,
shipping costs, or any other benefits that are determinable.
(7) "Large project" means a project that meets project cost, benefit cost ratio,
return on state investment, and investment requirements established by the office of
multimodal commerce by rule promulgated in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act.
(8) "Standard project" means a project, other than a large project ,that meets
benefit cost ratio and return on state investment requirements established by the
office of multimodal commerce by rule promulgated in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act.
§3452. Methodology for port project evaluation
A.(1) Applications for funding of any port construction or development
project may be submitted by any port authority on a quarterly basis, except as
provided in R.S. 34:3456. Applications shall be submitted to the department no later
than the first of March, June, September, and December of each calendar year for
consideration of funding or funding obligation authority in the following fiscal years.
Applications submitted in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter shall be
subject to the provisions of R.S. 39:101 through 128. Information to be provided in
the application shall include but not be limited to the following:
(a) Description of the project and demonstration of immediate need for the
project.
(b) Preliminary project design and cost estimate.
(c) Description of project area.
* * *
D. The department may contract with the Louisiana State University Ports
and Waterways Institute any state college or university for any of the duties
associated with the development of the port priority program, including but not
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 776 ENROLLED
limited to the development, review, and evaluation of plans and specifications, and
the development of the port priority program list. However, development of and
authority over the final determination of the port priority list shall remain with the
department and the joint committee as provided in this Chapter.
* * *
§3453. Priority list of projects; public hearings; final program
Each quarter, the department shall prepare and shall furnish a prioritized list
of projects, based on the applications received by the department during that quarter,
to the joint committee. The joint committee shall receive the prioritized list of
projects from the department for each of the first three quarters of the year, and shall
call a public hearing within thirty days of receiving the list in order to receive public
testimony regarding any project on the list. At such hearing, the joint committee
shall vote to either accept, reject, or modify the list. Each quarter, the department
shall reprioritize the list of projects to reflect the cumulative list of projects
recommended by the department. After application recommendations for the last
quarter are made by the department, the department shall submit the final port
construction and development priority program for the ensuing fiscal year to the
joint committee for approval. Prior to the convening of the regular session of the
legislature, the joint committee shall hold a public hearing for the purpose of
reviewing the final program for the ensuing fiscal year. Prior to such hearing, the
department shall publish the appropriate official notice in the necessary journals
Official Journal of the State, as provided for in R.S. 43:81, beginning on July 1,
2027. The final program shall be based upon the anticipated revenues to be
appropriated by the legislature or other funding obligation authority and the projects
shall be listed in order of priority. When this final construction program is presented
to the legislature for funding or funding obligation authority for the ensuing fiscal
year, the legislature shall not add any projects to this final construction program.
Any project recommended by the department and approved by the joint committee
but for which funds are unavailable in the fiscal year for which it was approved shall
remain on the prioritized list of projects and shall be carried forward to the next
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 776 ENROLLED
fiscal year. Such project shall retain its place on the prioritized list of projects and
shall receive a higher priority over newly recommended projects in the next fiscal
year.
* * *
§3457. Allocation, reallocation of funds; deposit to Transportation Trust Fund
A. The Transportation Trust Fund shall be the source of state funds provided
for any port project on the priority list approved pursuant to the provisions of this
Chapter. Prior to the commencement of any work, the department shall require the
presiding officer of each port authority involved in a project to execute an agreement
and statement of sponsorship to provide a ten percent the local match requirement
in the appropriate category of projects pursuant to Subsection C of this Section for
the cost of construction of the project including the cost of any items stipulated under
the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection. The department shall further
stipulate that such agreement include but not be limited to the following:
* * *
C. The following project categories shall require the stipulated local match
as defined by the department:
(1) A standard project shall require a ten percent local match.
(2) A large project shall require a twenty percent local match, subject to the
legislature allocating additional Transportation Trust Fund dollars to the Port
Construction and Development Priority Program.
* * *
§3473. Priority list of projects; public hearings; final program
Each quarter, the office shall prepare and furnish to the joint committee a
prioritized list of projects based on the applications received by the office during that
quarter. The joint committee shall receive the prioritized list of projects from the
office for each of the first three quarters of the year, and shall call a public hearing
within thirty days of receiving the list in order to receive public testimony regarding
any project on the list. At such hearing, the joint committee shall vote to either
accept, reject, or modify the list. Each quarter, the office shall reprioritize the list of
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 776 ENROLLED
projects to reflect the cumulative list of projects recommended by the office. After
application recommendations for the last quarter are made by the office, the office
shall submit the final waterway dredging and deepening priority program for the
ensuing fiscal year to the joint committee for approval. Prior to the convening of the
regular session of the legislature, the joint committee shall hold a public hearing for
the purpose of reviewing the final program for the ensuing fiscal year. Prior to such
hearing, the office shall publish the appropriate official notice on the department's
website in the Official Journal of the State, as provided for in R.S. 43:81, beginning
on July 1, 2027. The final program shall be based upon the anticipated revenues to
be appropriated by the legislature or other funding obligation authority and the
projects shall be listed in order of priority. When this final construction program is
presented to the legislature for funding or funding obligation authority for the
ensuing fiscal year, the legislature shall not add any projects to this final construction
program. Any project recommended by the office and approved by the joint
committee for which funds are unavailable in the fiscal year but for which it was
approved shall remain on the prioritized list of projects and shall be carried forward
to the next fiscal year.
Section 2. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
alphabetize and renumber the definitions contained in R.S. 34:3451 and to correct any cross-
references to the renumbered paragraphs if necessary, consistent with the provisions of this
Act.
Section 3. The office of multimodal commerce shall promulgate rules in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act, establishing the following:
(1) The project cost range, benefit cost ratio, return on state investment for
a project to qualify as a large project.
(2) The benefit cost ratio and return on state investment required for a project
to qualify as a standard project.
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 776 ENROLLED
(3) The maximum amount of state participation in standard projects and large
projects, and the maximum annual allotment per port for each.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.